Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1
PEACE OFFICERS

Law reviews:

For article, "Controlling the Criminal Justice System: Colorado as a Case Study", see 94 Denv. L. Rev. 497 (2017).

16-2.5-101. Peace officer - description - general authority.

A person who is included within the provisions of this article and who meets all standards imposed by law on a peace officer is a peace officer, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person other than a person designated in this article is a peace officer. A peace officer may be certified by the peace officers standards and training board pursuant to part 3 of article 31 of title 24, C.R.S., and, at a minimum, has the authority to enforce all laws of the state of Colorado while acting within the scope of his or her authority and in the performance of his or her duties, unless otherwise limited within this part 1.

A peace officer certified by the peace officers standards and training board shall have the authority to carry firearms at all times, concealed or otherwise, subject to the written firearms policy created by the agency employing the peace officer. All other peace officers shall have the authority to carry firearms, concealed or otherwise, while engaged in the performance of their duties or as otherwise authorized by the written policy of the agency employing the officer.

As used in every statute, unless the context otherwise requires, "law enforcement officer" means a peace officer.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1605, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2007.

16-2.5-102. Certified peace officer - P.O.S.T. certification required.

The following peace officers shall meet all the standards imposed by law on a peace officer and shall be certified by the peace officers standards and training board, referred to in this article as the "P.O.S.T. board": A chief of police; a police officer; a sheriff; an undersheriff; a deputy sheriff; a Colorado state patrol officer; a town marshal; a deputy town marshal; a reserve police officer; a reserve deputy sheriff; a reserve deputy town marshal; a police officer or reserve police officer employed by a state institution of higher education; a Colorado wildlife officer; a Colorado parks and recreation officer; a Colorado police administrator or police officer employed by the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo; an attorney general criminal investigator; a community parole officer; a public transit officer; a municipal court marshal; and the department of corrections inspector general.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1606, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1162, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 85, § 1, effective March 18.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2069, § 26, effective August 11.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 759, § 25, effective June 6.

16-2.5-103. Sheriff - undersheriff - certified deputy sheriff - noncertified deputy sheriff.

A sheriff, an undersheriff, and a deputy sheriff are peace officers whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado. A sheriff shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board pursuant to section 30-10-501.6, C.R.S. An undersheriff and a deputy sheriff shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

A noncertified deputy sheriff or detention officer is a peace officer employed by a county or city and county whose authority is limited to the duties assigned by and while working under the direction of the chief of police, sheriff, an official who has the duties of a sheriff in a city and county, or chief executive of the employing law enforcement agency.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1606, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-104. Coroner.

A coroner is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose authority shall be limited pursuant to part 6 of article 10 of title 30, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1606, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-105. Police officer.

A police officer, including a chief of police employed by a municipality, is a peace officer whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1606, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-106. Southern Ute Indian police officer.

A Southern Ute Indian police officer is a peace officer whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1606, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-107. Ute Mountain Ute Indian police officer.

A Ute Mountain Ute Indian police officer is a peace officer whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1606, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-108. Town marshal - deputy.

A town marshal or deputy town marshal is a peace officer whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1607, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-109. Fire arson investigator.

A fire arson investigator authorized by a unit of local government is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose authority shall be limited to the enforcement of arson and related laws and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1607, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 703, § 1, effective May 1.

16-2.5-110. Reserve police officer - reserve deputy sheriff - reserve deputy town marshal - definitions.

A reserve police officer, a reserve deputy sheriff, and a reserve deputy town marshal are reserve officers.

"Reserve officer" means a person authorized by a city, city and county, town, county, or state institution of higher education within this state to act as a reserve police officer, reserve deputy sheriff, or reserve town marshal for certain specific and limited periods of time while the person is authorized to be on duty and acting at the express direction or under the direct supervision of a fully P.O.S.T.-certified peace officer pursuant to section 16-2.5-103, 16-2.5-105, 16-2.5-108, or 16-2.5-120. A reserve officer is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose authority shall be limited to the authority granted by his or her authorizing agency.

A reserve officer:

Shall obtain reserve certification by the P.O.S.T. board as a reserve officer; or

May be a fully P.O.S.T.-certified peace officer serving as a volunteer and may be granted full peace officer status and authority at the discretion of the appointing authority.

A city, city and county, town, county, or state institution of higher education assigning duties to a reserve officer beyond those duties included in the P.O.S.T. board training shall assume the responsibility for ensuring that the reserve officer is adequately trained for the duties. Any expenses associated with the additional training shall be authorized by the city, city and county, town, county, or state institution of higher education. If the jurisdiction allows or requires the reserve officer to carry or use a firearm while on duty, the reserve officer shall be certified for firearms proficiency with the same frequency and subject to the same requirements as a P.O.S.T.-certified peace officer in the jurisdiction. A reserve officer who does not comply with the training requirements set forth in this subsection (2) is not authorized to enforce the laws of the state of Colorado.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 121, § 1, effective August 3, 2007.)

(3.5) If a police chief, sheriff, or town marshal determines that a reserve officer has been adequately trained to perform a law-enforcement function that the police chief, sheriff, or town marshal is required to perform, the police chief, sheriff, or town marshal may allow the reserve officer to perform the function either in uniform or in civilian clothes, whichever is appropriate.

When performing extradition duties, the reserve officer shall be accompanied by a P.O.S.T.-certified officer.

A reserve officer may be compensated for his or her time during a declared emergency or during a time of special need. In all other circumstances, a reserve officer shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed at the discretion of the city, city and county, town, county, or state institution of higher education benefitting from the services of the reserve officer for any authorized out-of-pocket expenses incurred in the course of his or her duties. The city, city and county, town, county, or state institution of higher education shall pay the cost of workers' compensation benefits for injuries incurred by a reserve officer while on duty and while acting within the scope of his or her assigned duties. A reserve officer is an authorized volunteer for purposes of article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

For the purposes of this section:

"Direct supervision" means an assignment given by a fully P.O.S.T.-certified peace officer to a reserve officer, which assignment is carried out in the personal presence of, or in direct radio or telephone contact with, and under the immediate control of, the fully P.O.S.T.-certified peace officer.

"Express direction" means a defined, task-specific assignment given by a fully P.O.S.T.-certified peace officer to a reserve officer. The fully P.O.S.T.-certified peace officer need not be present while the reserve officer carries out the assignment.

For the purposes of this section, a person serving as a citizen auxiliary is not a peace officer and the P.O.S.T. board shall not require the person to be certified.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1607, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2004:

(3), (4), and (6) amended and (3.5) added, p. 678, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2007:

(1), (3), and (6) amended, p. 121, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(1)(b), (2), and (5) amended, p. 85, § 2, effective March 18.

16-2.5-111. Executive director of the department of public safety - deputy executive director of the department of public safety - director of the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety.

The executive director and deputy executive director of the department of public safety and the director of the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety are peace officers whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1608, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB12-1079), ch. 21, p. 56, § 1, effective March 16.

16-2.5-112. Director of the division of homeland security and emergency management.

The director of the division of homeland security and emergency management in the department of public safety is a peace officer whose authority includes the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1608, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1283), ch. 240, p. 1132, § 39, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 240, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

16-2.5-112.5. Manager of the office of prevention and security within the division of homeland security and emergency management.

The manager of the office of prevention and security within the division of homeland security and emergency management in the department of public safety is a peace officer whose authority includes the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1209), ch. 247, p. 1043, § 1, effective August 9.

16-2.5-113. Colorado bureau of investigation director - agent.

A director of the Colorado bureau of investigation is a peace officer whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board. A Colorado bureau of investigation agent is a peace officer whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado pursuant to section 24-33.5-409, C.R.S., and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1608, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1076), ch. 6, p. 16, § 1, effective February 27.

16-2.5-114. Colorado state patrol officer.

A Colorado state patrol officer is a peace officer whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado pursuant to section 24-33.5-212, C.R.S., and who shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1609, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-115. Port of entry officer.

A port of entry officer is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose authority shall be limited pursuant to section 42-8-104, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1609, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-116. Colorado wildlife officer - special wildlife officer.

A Colorado wildlife officer employed by the Colorado division of parks and wildlife in the department of natural resources is a peace officer whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado pursuant to section 33-1-102 (4.3), C.R.S., and who shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board. Each Colorado wildlife officer shall be required to complete a minimum of forty hours of continuing law enforcement education per calendar year, or such number of hours as may otherwise be required by law.

A special wildlife officer is a peace officer whose authority is limited as defined by the director of the division of parks and wildlife pursuant to section 33-1-110 (5), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added p. 1609, § 2, effective August 6; (2) amended, p. 1954, § 50, effective August 6.

16-2.5-117. Colorado parks and recreation officer - special parks and recreation officer.

A Colorado parks and recreation officer employed by the Colorado division of parks and wildlife in the department of natural resources is a peace officer whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado pursuant to section 33-10-102 (17), C.R.S., and who shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board. Each Colorado parks and recreation officer shall be required to complete a minimum of forty hours of continuing law enforcement education per calendar year, or such number of hours as may otherwise be required by law.

A special parks and recreation officer is a peace officer whose authority is limited as defined by the director of the division of parks and wildlife pursuant to section 33-10-109 (1)(f), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1609, § 2, effective August 6; (2) amended, p. 1954, § 51, effective August 6.

16-2.5-118. Commissioner of agriculture.

The commissioner of agriculture or his or her designee is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose authority shall be limited pursuant to sections 35-36-103 and 35-36-312 of the "Commodity Handler and Farm Products Act"; the "Animal Protection Act", section 35-42-107 (4); and the "Pet Animal Care and Facilities Act", section 35-80-109 (6).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1609, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-225), ch. 262, p. 1246, § 4, effective August 9.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 753, § 5, effective June 29.

16-2.5-119. State brand inspector.

A state brand inspector is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose authority shall be limited pursuant to section 35-53-128, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1609, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-120. Colorado state higher education security officer.

A Colorado state higher education security officer employed by a state institution of higher education pursuant to sections 24-7-101 to 24-7-106, C.R.S., is a peace officer whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1610, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 86, § 3, effective March 18.

16-2.5-121. Executive director of the department of revenue - senior director of enforcement for the department of revenue.

The executive director and the senior director of enforcement of the department of revenue are peace officers while engaged in the performance of their duties whose authority includes the enforcement of laws and rules regarding automobile dealers pursuant to section 44-20-105 (3), the lottery pursuant to sections 44-40-106 (3) and 44-40-107 (8), medical marijuana pursuant to article 10 of title 44, limited gaming pursuant to article 30 of title 44, liquor pursuant to section 44-3-905 (1), and racing events pursuant to section 44-32-203 (1), and the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1610, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1284), ch. 355, p. 1685, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2063, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 139, § 7, effective October 1; entire section amended, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 238, § 9, effective October 1; entire section amended, (HB 18-1023), ch. 55, p. 586, § 10, effective October 1; entire section amended, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 322, § 10, effective October 1; entire section amended, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1078, § 6, effective October 1; entire section amended, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 362, § 6, effective October 1; entire section amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1699, § 15, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2936, § 14, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by SB 18-030, SB 18-034, HB 18-1023, HB 18-1024, HB 18-1025, and HB 18-1027 were harmonized.

16-2.5-122. Auto industry investigator.

The director of the auto industry division or an auto industry investigator is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose authority is limited to the enforcement of section 44-20-105 (3).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1610, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2064, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 139, § 8, effective October 1.

16-2.5-122.5. Motor vehicle criminal investigator.

A motor vehicle criminal investigator employed by the department of revenue is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of the investigator's duties and whose primary authority is as stated in section 42-1-222, and whose authority also includes the enforcement of all of the laws of the state of Colorado, and who shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1088), ch. 55, p. 258, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1088, see section 1 of chapter 55, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

16-2.5-123. Director of the division of gaming - gaming investigator.

The director of the division of gaming in the department of revenue or a gaming investigator in the department of revenue is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose primary authority shall be as stated in section 44-30-204 and shall also include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1610, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 238, § 10, effective October 1.

16-2.5-123.5. Criminal tax enforcement special agent.

A criminal tax enforcement special agent employed by the department of revenue is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of the investigator's duties and while acting under proper orders or rules, whose primary authority is the enforcement of section 39-21-118, and also includes the enforcement of all of the laws of the state of Colorado, and who shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1088), ch. 55, p. 258, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1088, see section 1 of chapter 55, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

16-2.5-124. Liquor enforcement investigator.

A liquor enforcement investigator is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties and while acting under proper orders or regulations whose primary authority shall be as stated in sections 44-3-905 (1) and 44-7-104 and shall also include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1610, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-036), ch. 34, p. 377, § 5, effective October 1; entire section amended, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1078, § 7, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by SB 18-036 and HB 18-1025 were harmonized.

16-2.5-124.5. Director of marijuana enforcement and marijuana enforcement investigator.

The director of the marijuana enforcement division or a marijuana enforcement investigator is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties and while acting under proper orders or rules pursuant to article 10 of title 44, and shall also include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1284), ch. 355, p. 1685, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1317), ch. 329, p. 1864, § 6, effective May 28.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1023), ch. 55, p. 586, § 11, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2937, § 15, effective January 1, 2020.

16-2.5-125. State lottery investigator.

A state lottery investigator is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose primary authority shall be as stated in sections 44-40-106 (3) and 44-40-107 (8) and shall also include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1610, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 363, § 7, effective October 1.

16-2.5-126. Director of racing events - racing events supervisor - racing events investigator.

The director of racing events, a racing events supervisor, and a racing events investigator are peace officers while engaged in the performance of their duties whose primary authority shall be as stated in section 44-32-203 (1) and shall also include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1610, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 322, § 11, effective October 1.

16-2.5-127. State student loan investigator.

A state student loan investigator is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose authority shall be limited pursuant to section 23-3.1-104 (2)(q), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1611, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-128. Colorado attorney general - chief deputy attorney general - solicitor general - assistant solicitor general - deputy attorney general - assistant attorney general of criminal enforcement - assistant attorney general and employee as designated.

The attorney general, chief deputy attorney general, solicitor general, assistant solicitors general, deputy attorneys general, assistant attorneys general of criminal enforcement, and certain other assistant attorneys general and employees of the department of law who are designated by the attorney general are peace officers whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1611, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-020), ch. 39, p. 105, § 1, effective March 21.

16-2.5-129. Attorney general criminal investigator.

An attorney general criminal investigator is a peace officer whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1611, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-130. P.O.S.T. director - P.O.S.T. board investigator.

The director of the P.O.S.T. board and a P.O.S.T. board investigator are peace officers while engaged in the performance of their duties whose primary authority shall include the enforcement of laws and rules pertaining to the training and certification of peace officers and shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1611, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-131. Chief security officer for the general assembly.

The chief security officer for the general assembly is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose authority shall be limited pursuant to section 2-2-402, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1611, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-132. District attorney - assistant district attorney - chief deputy district attorney - deputy district attorney - special deputy district attorney - special prosecutor.

A district attorney, an assistant district attorney, a chief deputy district attorney, a deputy district attorney, a special deputy district attorney, and a special prosecutor are peace officers whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1611, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-133. District attorney chief investigator - district attorney investigator.

A district attorney chief investigator and a district attorney investigator are peace officers whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1611, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-134. Department of corrections inspector general - department of corrections investigator.

The department of corrections inspector general and a department of corrections investigator are peace officers whose authority shall be pursuant to section 17-1-103.8, C.R.S., and whose authority shall include the enforcement of all the laws of the state of Colorado. A department of corrections investigator may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board. The inspector general shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1612, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-135. Executive director of the department of corrections - warden - corrections officer.

The executive director of the department of corrections, a warden, a corrections officer employed by the department of corrections, or other department of corrections employee assigned by the executive director, is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties pursuant to title 17, C.R.S., whose primary authority is the supervision of persons in the custody or confinement of the department of corrections and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1612, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-136. Community parole officer.

A community parole officer employed by the department of corrections is responsible for supervising offenders in the community and supporting the division of adult parole in providing assistance to parolees to secure employment, housing, and other services to support their successful reintegration into the community while recognizing the need for public safety. A community parole officer is a peace officer whose authority shall be pursuant to section 17-27-105.5, C.R.S., and whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado, and who shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1612, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1360), ch. 263, p. 1193, § 1, effective May 25.

16-2.5-137. Adult probation officer.

An adult probation officer is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose authority shall be limited pursuant to part 2 of article 11 of this title.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1612, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-138. Juvenile probation officer - juvenile parole officer.

A juvenile probation officer and a juvenile parole officer are peace officers while engaged in the performance of their duties. The authority of a juvenile probation officer and a juvenile parole officer is limited pursuant to sections 19-2.5-1107 and 19-2.5-1204.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1612, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 712, § 20, effective October 1.

16-2.5-139. Police administrator - police officer employed by the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo.

A police administrator and a police officer employed by the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo are peace officers whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado pursuant to article 7 of title 24, C.R.S., and who shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board. Each police administrator or police officer employed by the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo shall complete a minimum of forty hours of continuing law enforcement education per calendar year, or such number of hours as may otherwise be required by law.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1612, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-097), ch. 110, p. 456, § 1, effective August 5.

16-2.5-140. Correctional security officer employed by the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo.

A correctional security officer employed by the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties as provided in article 7 of title 24, C.R.S., and whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado, and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1612, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-097), ch. 110, p. 456, § 2, effective August 5.

16-2.5-141. Colorado state security guard.

A Colorado state security guard is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties pursuant to article 7 of title 24, C.R.S., whose authority shall be limited to the scope and authority of his or her assigned duties and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1613, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-097), ch. 110, p. 456, § 3, effective August 5.

16-2.5-142. Railroad peace officer.

A railroad peace officer is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose authority shall be limited pursuant to section 40-32-104.5, C.R.S., and who may be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1613, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-143. Public utilities commission member.

A public utilities commission member is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties whose authority shall be limited pursuant to articles 1 to 17 of title 40, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1613, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-144. Colorado National Guardsman.

A Colorado National Guardsman is a peace officer while acting under call of the governor in cases of emergency or civil disorder. His or her authority shall be limited to the period of call-up specified by the governor and shall be exercised only if the executive order of the governor calling the National Guard to state duty specifies that enforcement of the laws of the state of Colorado is a purpose for the call-up.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 1613, § 2, effective August 6.

16-2.5-145. Municipal court marshal.

A municipal court marshal who is employed by a municipality and is specifically designated a peace officer by the municipality is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties. The authority of such a municipal court marshal shall be limited to providing security for the municipal court, transporting, detaining, and maintaining control over prisoners, executing all arrest warrants within the municipal court and its grounds, executing municipal court arrest warrants within the municipal limits, and serving legal process issued by the municipal court within the municipal limits. A municipal court marshal shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 414, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 27, § 2, effective July 1, 2007.

16-2.5-146. Public transit officer - definitions.

A public transit officer who is employed by a public transportation entity and is specifically designated a peace officer by the public transportation entity is a peace officer while engaged in the performance of his or her duties in accordance with any policies and procedures adopted by the public transportation entity. A public transit officer's authority includes the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado. A public transit officer shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

As used in this section, "public transportation entity" means a mass transit district, a mass transit authority, or any public entity authorized under the laws of this state to provide mass transportation services to the general public.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1162, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 28, § 3, effective July 1, 2007.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (SB 12-044), ch. 274, p. 1449, § 5, effective June 8.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-221), ch. 268, p. 1044, § 1, effective August 5.

16-2.5-147. Federal special agents.

A special agent of the federal bureau of investigation or the United States bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives, a deputy or special deputy United States marshal, or an officer of the federal protective service of the United States department of homeland security immigration and customs enforcement, in any jurisdiction within the state of Colorado, is a peace officer whose authority is limited as provided in this section. The special agent, deputy or special deputy, or officer is authorized to act in the following circumstances:

The special agent, deputy or special deputy, or officer is:

Responding to a nonfederal felony or misdemeanor that has been committed in the presence of the special agent, deputy or special deputy, or officer;

Responding to an emergency situation in which the special agent, deputy or special deputy, or officer has probable cause to believe that a nonfederal felony or misdemeanor involving injury or threat of injury to a person or property has been, or is being, committed and immediate action is required to prevent escape, serious bodily injury, or destruction of property;

Rendering assistance at the request of a Colorado peace officer; or

Effecting an arrest or providing assistance as part of a bona fide task force or joint investigation with Colorado peace officers; and

The agent, deputy or special deputy, or officer acts in accordance with the rules and regulations of his or her employing agency.

A special agent of the federal bureau of investigation or the United States bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives, a deputy or special deputy United States marshal, or an officer of the federal protective service of the United States department of homeland security immigration and customs enforcement is a person who is employed by the United States government, assigned to the federal bureau of investigation, the United States bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives, the United States marshal service, or the federal protective service of the United States department of homeland security immigration and customs enforcement, empowered to effect an arrest with or without a warrant for violations of the United States code, and authorized to carry a firearm and use deadly force in the performance of the special agent's, deputy's or special deputy's, or officer's official duties as a federal law enforcement officer.

Upon effecting an arrest under the authority of this section, a special agent of the federal bureau of investigation or the United States bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives, a deputy or special deputy United States marshal, or an officer of the federal protective service of the United States department of homeland security immigration and customs enforcement shall immediately surrender custody of the arrested individual to a Colorado peace officer.

This section does not impose liability on or require indemnification or create a waiver of sovereign immunity by the state of Colorado for any action performed under this section by a special agent of the federal bureau of investigation or the United States bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives, a deputy or special deputy United States marshal, or an officer of the federal protective service of the United States department of homeland security immigration and customs enforcement.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand the authority of federal law enforcement officers to initiate or conduct an independent investigation into violations of Colorado law.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 126, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 701, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1073), ch. 32, p. 90, § 1, effective August 10.

16-2.5-148. Colorado state higher education police officer.

A Colorado state higher education police officer employed by a state institution of higher education pursuant to article 7.5 of title 24, C.R.S., is a peace officer whose authority shall include the enforcement of all laws of the state of Colorado and who shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 86, § 4, effective March 18.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-097), ch. 110, p. 457, § 4, effective August 5.